West Virginia, session 2025, HB2258.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 6. Authorization for Department of Homeland Security to promulgate legislative rules. §64-6-1. State Emergency Response Commission. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 29, 2024, authorized under the authority of §15-5A-5 of this code, modified by the State Emergency Response Commission to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 1, 2024, relating to the State Emergency Response Commission (Emergency Planning Grant Program, 55 CSR 02), is authorized.